Washington statutes.
RCW 43.105.057

Rule-making authority.

The agency shall adopt rules as necessary under chapter 34.05 RCW to implement the provisions of this chapter.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 807; 1992 c 20 s 11; 1990 c 208 s 13.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Severability—Captions not law—1992 c 20: See notes following RCW 43.105.025.